Hawaii statutes.
[§11-313] No compensation. The
commissioners shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of
their duties. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next